Nebraska, session 109, LB1160.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 25-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-2701 (1) All provisions in the rules and codes of criminal and
civil procedure governing actions and proceedings in the district court
not in conflict with statutes specifically governing procedure in county
courts and related to matters for which no specific provisions have been
made for county courts shall govern and apply to all actions and
proceedings in the county court.
(2) County courts may seal records of a person as provided under
sections 43-2,108.01 to 43-2,108.05.
(3) Unless specifically provided to the contrary in the Uniform
Probate Code or unless inconsistent with its provisions, the rules and
codes of civil procedure, including the rules concerning vacation of
orders and appellate review, govern proceedings under this section.
Sec. 2. Section 30-2301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2301 (1) Any part of a decedent's estate not effectively disposed
of by will passes by intestate succession to the decedent's heirs as
prescribed in the following sections of this code, except as modified by
the decedent's will.
(2) A decedent by will may expressly exclude or limit the right of
an individual or class to succeed to property of the decedent passing by
intestate succession. If that individual or a member of that class
survives the decedent, the share of the decedent's intestate estate to
which that individual or class would have succeeded passes as if that
individual or each member of that class had disclaimed the intestate
share. Any part of the estate of a decedent not effectively disposed of
by his will passes to his heirs as prescribed in the following sections
of this code.
Sec. 3. Section 30-2302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
30-2302 The intestate share of the surviving spouse is:
(1) if there is no surviving issue or parent of the decedent, the
entire intestate estate;
(2) if there is no surviving issue but the decedent is survived by a
parent or parents, the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus
one-half of the balance of the intestate estate;
(3) if there are surviving issue all of whom are issue of the
surviving spouse also, the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus
one-half of the balance of the intestate estate;
(4) if there are surviving issue one or more of whom are not issue
of the surviving spouse, one-half of the intestate estate.
Sec. 4. Section 30-2322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2322 A surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in this
state is entitled to a homestead allowance of seven thousand five hundred
dollars for a decedent who dies before January 1, 2011, and twenty
thousand dollars for a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2011, and
before January 1, 2027, and twenty-five thousand dollars for a decedent
who dies on or after January 1, 2027. If there is no surviving spouse,
each minor child and each dependent child of the decedent is entitled to
a homestead allowance amounting to the amount allowed for a surviving
spouse divided by the number of minor and dependent children of the
decedent. The homestead allowance is exempt from and has priority over
all claims against the estate except for costs and expenses of
administration. Homestead allowance is in addition to any share passing
to the surviving spouse or minor or dependent child by the will of the
decedent unless otherwise provided therein, by intestate succession or by
way of elective share.
Sec. 5. Section 30-2323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2323 (1) In addition to the homestead allowance, the surviving
-3-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in this state is entitled from the
estate to value not exceeding five thousand dollars for a decedent who
dies before January 1, 2011, and twelve thousand five hundred dollars for
a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2011, and before January 1,
2027, and seventeen thousand five hundred dollars for a decedent who dies
on or after January 1, 2027, in excess of any security interests therein
in household furniture, automobiles, furnishings, appliances, and
personal effects. If there is no surviving spouse, children of the
decedent are entitled jointly to the same value unless the decedent has
provided in his or her will that one or more of such children shall be
disinherited, in which case only those children not so disinherited shall
be so entitled. For purposes of this section, disinherited means
providing in one's will that a child shall take nothing or a nominal
amount of ten dollars or less from the estate.
(2) If encumbered chattels are selected and if the value in excess
of security interests, plus that of other exempt property, is less than
the amount allowed under subsection (1) of this section, or if there is
not that amount worth of exempt property in the estate, the spouse or
children are entitled to other assets of the estate, if any, to the
extent necessary to make up the amount allowed under subsection (1) of
this section. Rights to exempt property and assets needed to make up a
deficiency of exempt property have priority over all claims against the
estate except for costs and expenses of administration, except for claims
filed by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section
68-919 notwithstanding the order of payment established in section
30-2487, and except that the right to any assets to make up a deficiency
of exempt property shall abate as necessary to permit prior payment of
homestead allowance and family allowance.
(3) These rights are in addition to any benefit or share passing to
the surviving spouse by the will of the decedent unless otherwise
provided therein, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.
-4-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
These rights are in addition to any benefit or share passing to the
surviving children by intestate succession and are in addition to any
benefit or share passing by the will of the decedent to those surviving
children not disinherited unless otherwise provided in the will.
Sec. 6. Section 30-2325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2325 If the estate is otherwise sufficient, property specifically
devised is not used to satisfy rights to homestead and exempt property.
Subject to this restriction, the surviving spouse, the guardians of the
minor children, or children who are adults may select property of the
estate as homestead allowance and exempt property. After giving such
notice as the court may require in a proceeding initiated under the
provisions of section 30-2405, the personal representative may make these
selections if the surviving spouse, the children or the guardians of the
minor children are unable or fail to do so within a reasonable time or if
there are no guardians of the minor children. The personal representative
may execute an instrument or deed of distribution to establish the
ownership of property taken as homestead allowance or exempt property.
The personal representative may determine the family allowance in a lump
sum not exceeding nine thousand dollars for a decedent who dies before
January 1, 2011, and twenty thousand dollars for a decedent who dies on
or after January 1, 2011, and before January 1, 2027, and twenty-five
thousand dollars for a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2027, or
periodic installments not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars per month
for one year for a decedent who dies before January 1, 2011, and one
thousand six hundred sixty-six dollars and sixty-seven cents per month
for one year for a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2011, and
before January 1, 2027, and two thousand eighty-three dollars and thirty-
three cents per month for one year for a decedent who dies on or after
January 1, 2027. The personal representative may disburse funds of the
estate in payment of the family allowance and any part of the homestead
-5-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
allowance payable in cash. The personal representative or any interested
person aggrieved by any selection, determination, payment, proposed
payment, or failure to act under this section may petition the court for
appropriate relief, which relief may provide a family allowance larger or
smaller than that which the personal representative determined or could
have determined.
The homestead allowance, the exempt property, and the family
allowance as finally determined by the personal representative or by the
court, shall vest in the surviving spouse as of the date of decedent's
death, as a vested indefeasible right of property, shall survive as an
asset of the surviving spouse's estate if unpaid on the date of death of
such surviving spouse, and shall not terminate upon the death or
remarriage of the surviving spouse.
Sec. 7. Section 30-3801, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
30-3801 (UTC 101) Sections 30-3801 to 30-38,115 and sections 9 to 11
of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Trust
Code.
Sec. 8. Section 30-3803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-3803 (UTC 103) In the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code:
(1) "Action", with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a
failure to act.
(2) "Ascertainable standard" means a standard relating to an
individual's health, education, support, or maintenance within the
meaning of section 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as defined in section 49-801.01.
(3) "Beneficiary" means a person that:
(A) has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested
or contingent; or
(B) in a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of
-6-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
appointment over trust property.
(4) "Charitable trust" means a trust, or portion of a trust, created
for a charitable purpose described in subsection (a) of section 30-3831.
(5) "Conservator" means a person appointed by the court to
administer the estate of a minor or adult individual.
(6) "Environmental law" means a federal, state, or local law, rule,
regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment.
(7) "Guardian" means a person who has qualified as a guardian of a
minor or incapacitated person pursuant to testamentary or court
appointment, but excludes one who is merely a guardian ad litem.
(8) "Interests of the beneficiaries" means the beneficial interests
provided in the terms of the trust.
(9) "Jurisdiction", with respect to a geographic area, includes a
state or country.
(10) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint
venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(11) "Power of withdrawal" means a presently exercisable general
power of appointment other than a power: (A) which is exercisable by a
trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard; or (B) which is
exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a
person holding an adverse interest.
(12) "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership,
whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or any interest therein.
(13) "Qualified beneficiary" means a beneficiary who, on the date
the beneficiary's qualification is determined:
(A) is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or
principal;
(B) would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust
-7-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision terminated on that date without
causing the trust to terminate; or
(C) would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust
income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.
(14) "Regulated financial-service institution" means a state-
chartered or federally chartered financial institution in which the
monetary deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation.
(15) "Revocable", as applied to a trust, means revocable by the
settlor without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse
interest.
(16) "Settlor" means a person, including a testator, who creates, or
contributes property to, a trust. If more than one person creates or
contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion
of the trust property attributable to that person's contribution except
to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that
portion.
(17) "Spendthrift provision" means a term of a trust which restrains
both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest.
(18) "State" includes any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or
possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.
(19) "Terms of a trust" means: (A) Except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (19)(B) of this section, the manifestation of the settlor's
intent regarding a trust's provisions as: (i) Expressed in the trust
instrument; or (ii) established by other evidence that would be
admissible in a judicial proceeding; or (B) the trust's provisions, as
established, determined, or amended by a: (i) Trustee or other person in
accordance with applicable law; (ii) court order; or (iii) nonjudicial
settlement agreement under section 30-3811. the manifestation of the
-8-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as expressed in the trust
instrument or as may be established by other evidence that would be
admissible in a judicial proceeding.
(20) "Trust instrument" means an instrument executed by the settlor
that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto.
(21) "Trustee" includes an original, additional, and successor
trustee, and a cotrustee.
Sec. 9. A contract to make a trust, or not to revoke a trust, if
executed on or after January 1, 1977, shall only be established by: (1)
Provisions of a will or a trust stating the material provisions of the
contract; (2) an express reference in a will or trust to a contract and
extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or (3) a writing
signed by the decedent evidencing the contract. The execution of a joint
trust does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the
trust.
Sec. 10. A provision in a trust purporting to penalize any
interested person for contesting the trust or instituting other
proceedings relating to the trust is unenforceable if probable cause
exists for instituting proceedings.
Sec. 11. The rules of construction that apply in this state to the
interpretation and disposition of property by will shall also apply as
appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the
disposition of the trust property.
Sec. 12. Section 30-38,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-38,103 (a) A certification of trust may confirm the following
facts or contain the following information:
(1) The existence of a trust and, for an inter vivos trust, the date
of execution or, for a testamentary trust, the date of death of the
decedent;
(2) The identity of the grantor, settlor, or testator and each
-9-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
currently acting trustee;
(3) The powers of the trustee and any restrictions imposed upon the
trustee in dealing with the assets of the trust;
(4) The name or method of choosing successor trustees;
(5) The revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity
of any person holding a power to revoke it;
(6) If there is more than one trustee, whether all of the currently
acting trustees must, or if less than all, may, act to exercise
identified powers of the trustee;
(7) The identifying number of the trust and whether it is a social
security number or an employer identification number;
(8) The name of each beneficiary and the relationship to the
grantor, settlor, or testator;
(9) The state or other jurisdiction under which the trust was
established; and
(10) The form in which title to the assets of the trust is to be
taken; and .
(11) Any information necessary to establish a person's ownership of
a homestead for purposes of obtaining a homestead exemption under
sections 77-3501 to 77-3529.
(b) The certification of trust shall contain a statement that the
trust has not been revoked or amended to make any representations
contained in the certification of trust incorrect and that the signatures
are those of all the acting trustees.
Sec. 13. Section 77-2004, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2004 (1) In the case of a person described in subsection (2) of
this section father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister,
son, daughter, child or children legally adopted as such in conformity
with the laws of the state where adopted, any lineal descendant, any
lineal descendant legally adopted as such in conformity with the laws of
-10-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
the state where adopted, any person to whom the deceased for not less
than ten years prior to death stood in the acknowledged relation of a
parent, or the spouse or surviving spouse of any such persons, the rate
of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, one percent of the
clear market value of the property received by each person in excess of
forty thousand dollars; and
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, one percent of
the clear market value of the property received by each person in excess
of one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) Persons subject to inheritance tax at the rate prescribed by
this section are:
(a) A father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister,
son, daughter, child or children legally adopted as such in conformity
with the laws of the state where adopted;
(b) Any lineal descendant;
(c) Any lineal descendant legally adopted as such in conformity with
the laws of the state where adopted;
(d) Any person to whom the deceased for not less than ten years
prior to death stood in the acknowledged relation of a parent;
(e) Any lineal descendant of a person described in subdivision (d)
of this subsection;
(f) Any lineal descendant of a person described in subdivision (d)
of this subsection legally adopted as such in conformity with the laws of
the state where adopted; and
(g) The spouse or surviving spouse of any person described in
subdivisions (a) through (f) of this subsection.
(3) (2) Any interest in property, including any interest acquired in
the manner set forth in section 77-2002, which may be valued at a sum
less than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1)
of this section shall not be subject to tax. In addition, the homestead
-11-

LB1160 LB1160
2026 2026
allowance, exempt property, and family maintenance allowance shall not be
subject to tax. Interests passing to the surviving spouse by will, in the
manner set forth in section 77-2002, or in any other manner shall not be
subject to tax. Any interest passing to a person described in subsection
(2) (1) of this section who is under twenty-two years of age shall not be
subject to tax.
Sec. 14. Section 77-3503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3503 Owner shall mean the owner of record or surviving spouse,
the vendee in possession under a land contract or surviving spouse, one
of the joint tenants or tenants in common or surviving spouse, or the
beneficiary of a trust of which the trustee is the record title owner and
the beneficiary-occupant (1) has a specific right to occupy the premises
as stated in the trust instrument, (2) has the right to amend or revoke
the trust to obtain such power of occupancy or of title, or (3) has the
power to withdraw the homestead premises from the trust and place the
record title in such occupant's name. Owner shall also mean a resident of
a dwelling complex, the record title owner of which is a not-for-profit
corporation, who has by purchase for fair market value secured a life
tenancy in a taxable unit of the complex. The deed, trust instrument, or
contract, or a certification of trust as described in sections 30-38,102
to 30-38,106, memorandum showing that the criteria of this section have
been met shall be on file on the appropriate public record as of January
1 of the year for which exemption is sought, except that if such
instrument is not on file as of January 1, a copy of such instrument
shall be attached to such application before the homestead exemption
shall be granted.
Sec. 15. Original sections 25-2701, 30-2301, 30-2302, 30-2322,
30-2323, 30-2325, 30-3803, 30-38,103, and 77-3503, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 30-3801 and 77-2004, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-